Maryland, session 2025, HB0631.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
12–101.
(a) All proceedings for the acquisition of private property for public use by
condemnation are governed by the provisions of this title and of Title 12, Chapter 200 of
the Maryland Rules.
(b) (1) [Nothing] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, NOTHING in this title prevents this State or any of its instrumentalities or
political subdivisions, acting under statute or ordinance passed pursuant to Article III of
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0631*

HOUSE BILL 631
the Maryland Constitution, from taking private property for public use immediately on
making the required payment and giving any required security.
(2) THE STATE OR ANY OF ITS INSTRUMENTALITIES OR POLITICAL
SUBDIVISIONS MAY NOT TAKE BY EMINENT DOMAIN PRIVATELY OWNED PROPERTY
THAT IS SUBJECT TO A PERPETUAL AGRICULTURAL OR CONSERVATION EASEMENT.
(c) This title does not prevent the State Roads Commission from using the
procedures set forth in Title 8, Subtitle 3 of the Transportation Article, or prevent Baltimore
City from using the procedure set forth in the Charter of Baltimore City and §§ 21–12
through 21–22, inclusive, of the Public Local Laws of Baltimore City.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law, from June 1, 2014, to May 30, 2016, both
inclusive, the State or any of its instrumentalities or political subdivisions may not acquire
a mortgage or deed of trust by condemnation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.